Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-1206
Discovery of remains or goods; law enforcement officer; notice.

A law enforcement officer who receives notification pursuant to section 12-1205 shall promptly notify the landowner on whose property the human skeletal remains or burial goods were discovered, the county attorney, and the society.

Laws 1989, LB 340, § 6.